North Carolina statutes. Chapter 7A. Judicial Department.
Article 28. Uniform Costs and Fees in the Trial Divisions.
§ 7A-316.
Payment of witness fees in criminal actions.

A witness in a criminal action who is entitled to a witness fee and who proves his attendance prior to assessment of the bill of costs shall be paid by the clerk from State funds and the amount disbursed shall be assessed in the bill of costs. When the State is liable for the fee, a witness who proves his attendance not later than the last day of court in the week in which the trial was completed shall be paid by the clerk from State funds. If more than two witnesses shall be subpoenaed, bound over, or recognized, to prove a single material fact, disbursements to such additional witnesses shall be charged against the party issuing or requesting the subpoena.

History.

1965, c. 310, s. 1; 1971, c. 377, s. 28.

§ 7A-317.
Counties and municipalities required to advance costs and fees.

Counties and municipalities required to advance pay all costs and fees due to the court at the time of filing. The clerk of superior court may consent to allow the county or municipality to pay all costs and fees within 45 days of the date of the filing of any action in lieu of paying costs and fees at the time of filing.

The clerk of superior court shall withhold all facilities fees due to be remitted to a county or municipality when the county or municipality does not pay costs and fees due to the court within 90 days of the date of filing any action.

History.

1967, c. 691, s. 35; 2007-323, s. 30.10(d); 2008-193, ss. 1-3; 2013-225, s. 5.

§ 7A-317.1.
Disposition of fees in counties with unincorporated seats of court.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this Article, if a municipality listed in

G.S. 7A-133

as an additional seat of district court is not incorporated, the arrest, facilities, and jail fees which would ordinarily accrue thereto, shall instead accrue to the county in which the unincorporated municipality is located.

History.

1969, c. 1190, s. 341/2.

§ 7A-318.
Determination and disbursement of costs on and after date district court established.

On and after the date that the district court is established in a judicial district, costs in every action, proceeding or other matter pending in the General Court of Justice in that district, shall be assessed as provided in this Article, unless costs have been finally assessed according to prior law. In computing costs as provided in this section, the parties shall be given credit for any fees, costs, and commissions paid in the pending action, proceeding or other matter, before the district court was established in the district, except that no refunds are authorized.

In the administration of estates, costs shall be considered finally assessed according to prior law when they have been assessed at the time of the filing of any inventory, account, or other report. Costs at any filing on or after the date the district court is established in a judicial district shall be assessed as provided in this Article.

When the General Court of Justice fee and the facilities fee are assessed as provided in this Article and credit is given for fees, costs, and commissions paid before the district court was established in the district, the actual amount thereafter received by the clerk shall be remitted to the State for the support of the General Court of Justice.

When costs have been finally assessed according to prior law, but come into the hands of the clerk after the district court is established in the district, funds so received shall be disbursed according to prior law.

Cost funds in the hands of the clerk at the time the district court is established shall be disbursed according to prior law.

History.

1965, c. 310, s. 1; 1967, c. 691, s. 35.

§ 7A-319.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1971, c. 377, s. 32.

§ 7A-320.
Costs are exclusive.

The costs set forth in this Article are complete and exclusive, and in lieu of any other costs and fees.

History.

1983, c. 713, s. 1.

§ 7A-321.
Collection of offender fines and fees assessed by the court; collection assistance fee.

The Judicial Department may, in lieu of payment by cash or check, accept payment by credit card, charge card, or debit card for the fines, fees, and costs owed to the courts by offenders.

In attempting to collect the fines, fees, costs, and restitution owed by offenders not sentenced to supervised probation or active time, the Administrative Office of the Courts may do the following:

Assess a collection assistance fee if an amount due remains unpaid for 30 days after the time period allotted by the court. The amount of the collection assistance fee shall not exceed the average cost of collecting the debt or twenty percent (20%) of the amount past due, whichever is less.

Enter into contracts with a collection agency, agencies, or municipal or county government agencies to collect unpaid amounts owed. The Administrative Office of the Courts may provide by such contract for the collection assistance fee to be retained by the agency or agencies that collect the amounts owed.

Intercept tax refund checks under Chapter 105A of the General Statutes, the Setoff Debt Collection Act.

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-323, s. 1, effective July 1, 2011, and applicable to cases adjudicated on or after that date.

The court shall retain a collection assistance fee in the amount of ten percent (10%) of any cost or fee collected by the Department pursuant to this Article or Chapter 20 of the General Statutes and remitted to an agency of the State or any of its political subdivisions, other than a cost or fee listed in this subsection. The court shall remit the collection assistance fee to the State Treasurer for the support of the General Court of Justice.The collection assistance fee shall not be retained from the following:

Costs and fees designated by law for remission to or use by an agency or program of the Judicial Department or for support of the General Court of Justice.

Costs and fees designated by law for remission to the General Fund.

Costs and fees designated by law for remission to the Statewide Misdemeanant Confinement Fund.

History.

2006-187, s. 1(a); 2007-323, s. 30.9(a); 2009-451, s. 15.20(m); 2009-575, s. 14; 2011-145, s. 31.26(f1); 2011-192, ss. 7(n), 7(p); 2011-323, s. 1.

§§ 7A-322 through 7A-339.

Reserved for future codification purposes.